src/fst/stems/verbs.lexd
## Verbs
#  -----
## Verbs in the Hiligaynon language are actions.

PATTERN Verb_Root
VRoot
VRoot VRoot [:[aug,dim,rep]]

LEXICON VRoot
bakal # "buy"
baligya # "sell"
balik # "return"
basa # "read"
baton # "receive"
bulig # "help"
dala # "bring"
gamit # "use"
hambal # "speak"
hatag # "give"
inom # "drink"
kadto # "go"
kanta # "sing"
kaon # "eat"
kita # "see"
kuha # "take"
lakat # "walk"
lantaw # "watch"
luto # "cook"
nguy-ab # "yawn"
palapit # "approach"
pamangkot # "ask"
sabat # "answer"
siling # "say"
sulat # "write"
sunod # "follow"
tawag # "call"
tudlo # "teach"
tulog # "sleep"
tulok # "look"
tuon # "study"
